District of Columbia statutes.
34-1671.12

Rights, remedies, prohibitions; cumulative.

The rights, remedies, and prohibitions accorded by the provisions of this chapter are in addition to and cumulative of any right, remedy, or prohibition accorded by the common law or any statute of the District of Columbia and nothing contained herein shall be construed to deny, abrogate, or impair any such common law or statutory right, remedy, or prohibition.

History

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 13, 51 DCR 10549